Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB938.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2004-A(a)(7) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 2004-A. Board of Governors.--(a) The system shall be governed and all of its corporate powers exercised by the Board of Governors, which shall consist of twenty (20) members to be appointed as follows:* * *(7) Eleven (11) members shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, of which:(i) six (6) members shall be selected from the residents of this Commonwealth [and five (5)];1234567891011121314151617181920 (ii) three (3) members shall be selected from trustees of constituent institutions, except that no more than one trustee may represent a constituent institution[.];(iii) one (1) member must be a current or retired member of the State system bargaining unit of the American Federation of State, County and Municipal Employees and selected by the governing board of the bargaining unit; and(iv) one (1) member must be a current or retired member of the State system bargaining unit of the Association of Pennsylvania State College and University Faculties and selected by the governing board of the bargaining unit.A member appointed under this paragraph must have expertise or substantial experience in at least one area, including postsecondary education, finance, business, nonprofit management, law or public administration.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0938PN1004 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617